North Carolina, session 2025, SB119.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The following described property, referenced by Granville County
Tax Office Parcel Identification Number, is added to the corporate limits of the City of
Creedmoor:
180601467359 180601465477 180601463465 180602554562
180602556412 180604547430 180604546785 180603430967
180603236297 180603237295 180603239340 180603239240
180603332228 180603332118 180603238070 180603229081
180603320998 180603332010 180603333080 180603148501
180603031992 180603043305 180603046366 180603047395
180603049332 180603141208 180603142251 180603143088
180603145093 180603138893 180603136875 180603147062
180603135815 180603133873 180603045040 180603035760
180603047000 180603037724 180603048051 180603038776
180603140041 180603130719 180603131870 180603036153
180603039335 180603137353 180603127721 089611663448
089611751984 089611753386 089601478877 088612965444
088602987210 088612976039 088612966698 088612959651
089601088421 089601073648 089610373195 089610360734
089601284266 089601384152 089601389590 089601389377
089601378625 089610377426 089610378171 089610470279
089610470208 089610470471 089610461919 089610369781
089610369767 089610368708 089610367803 089601474672
089615623539 089619629199 089619720003 089619710807
089619710722 089619710536 089619710441 089619710266
089619710170 089619700985 089619617270 089619607987
089507693750 089507698861 089507698427 089507691150
089507674749 089507781670 089502786801 089507791462
089507791835 089604901457 089604816545 089604818903
089604824085 089604823216 089604823119 089604813948
089604815814 089604813795 089604812770 089604812720
089604812673 089604719657 089604820171 089604729120
*S119-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
089604728100 088602579841 088602578499 088602671698
088602578287 088602579240 088602579192 088602671248
088602672630 088602672377 088602662989 088602574433
088602574352 088602576194 088602575002 088602561778
088602563688 088602568849 088602568774 088602565414
088616746661 088616748603 088616748673 088616749634
088616749694 088616840654 088616841620 088616841587
088616842546 088616843506 088616843951 088612854044
088612759695 088612851568 088612852589 088612852494
088612854288 088612855272 088612856147 088612857130
088612858027 088612767112 088612768112 088612768190
088612769078 088612860056 088612861046 088612862357
088612862032 088612852827 088612863038 088612864028
088612865028 088612866028 088612867026 089611751984.
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the
territory described in Section 1(a) of this act as of January 1, 2025, is subject to municipal taxes
for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 2.(a) The following described property, identified by Granville County
Tax Property Identification Number, is removed from the corporate limits of the City of
Creedmoor: 180603417847.
SECTION 2.(b) This section has no effect upon the validity of any liens of the City
of Creedmoor for ad valorem taxes or special assessments outstanding before the effective date
of this section. Such liens may be collected or foreclosed upon after the effective date of this
section as though the property were still within the corporate limits of the City of Creedmoor.
SECTION 2.(c) This section becomes effective June 30, 2025. Property in the
territory described in Section 2(a) of this act as of January 1, 2025, is no longer subject to
municipal taxes for taxes imposed for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2025.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 119-First Edition